Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.415.010

Center for improvement of teaching—Improvement of teaching coordinating council—Teachers' institutes and workshops.

It shall be the responsibility of each educational service district board to establish a center for the improvement of teaching. The center shall administer, coordinate, and act as fiscal agent for such programs related to the recruitment and training of certificated and classified K-12 education personnel as may be delegated to the center by the superintendent of public instruction under RCW 28A.310.470. To assist in these activities, each educational service district board shall establish an improvement of teaching coordinating council to include, at a minimum, representatives as specified in RCW 28A.415.040. An existing in-service training task force, established pursuant to RCW 28A.415.040, may serve as the improvement of teaching coordinating council. The educational service district board shall ensure coordination of programs established pursuant to RCW 28A.415.030, 28A.410.060, and 28A.415.265.

The educational service district board may arrange each year for the holding of one or more teachers' institutes and/or workshops for professional staff preparation and in-service training in such manner and at such time as the board believes will be of benefit to the teachers and other professional staff of school districts within the educational service district and shall comply with rules of the professional educator standards board pursuant to RCW 28A.410.060 or the superintendent of public instruction. The board may provide such additional means of teacher and other professional staff preparation and in-service training as it may deem necessary or appropriate and there shall be a proper charge against the educational service district general expense fund when approved by the educational service district board.

Educational service district boards of contiguous educational service districts, by mutual arrangements, may hold joint institutes and/or workshops, the expenses to be shared in proportion to the numbers of certificated personnel as shown by the last annual reports of the educational service districts holding such joint institutes or workshops.

In local school districts employing more than one hundred teachers and other professional staff, the school district superintendent may hold a teachers' institute of one or more days in such district, said institute when so held by the school district superintendent to be in all respects governed by the provisions of this title and rules relating to teachers' institutes held by educational service district superintendents.

[ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 402; 2006 c 263 s 807; 1991 c 285 s 1; 1990 c 33 s 414; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 15 s 18. Prior: 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 139; 1975 1st ex.s. c 192 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 31; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 146; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.71.100; prior: 1965 c 139 s 21. Formerly RCW 28A.71.100, 28.71.100.]

NOTES:

Application—Enforcement of laws protecting health and safety—2013 2nd sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28A.600.022.

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 192: See note following RCW 28A.410.060.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 282: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.

Rights preserved—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.

Transitional bilingual instruction program—In-service training: RCW 28A.180.040(1)(f).